Washington statutes.
RCW 7.68.093

Medical examinations—Department to monitor quality and objectivity.

The department shall examine the credentials of persons conducting special medical examinations and shall monitor the quality and objectivity of examinations and reports. The department shall adopt rules to ensure that examinations are performed only by qualified persons meeting department standards.

[ 2011 c 346 s 505.]

NOTES:

Intent—Retroactive application—Effective date—2011 c 346: See notes following RCW 7.68.020.